Maine, session 132, LD1087.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §15907-A is enacted to read:
§15907-A. State share of school construction costs on or after July 1, 2026
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, beginning July 1, 2026, the
State's share of the total cost of a school construction project must be calculated in
accordance with this section.
1. State's share. The State's share of the total cost of a school construction project for
a school administrative unit is the greater of:
A. Twenty-five percent of the total cost of the school construction project; and
B. A percentage equal to the state share percentage of the school administrative unit's
total cost of education as determined under section 15688. For the purposes of this
paragraph, "state share percentage" has the same meaning as in section 15672,
subsection 31.
2. Rulemaking. The state board may adopt or amend rules related to the State's share
of the total cost of a school construction project as necessary to implement this section.
Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are major substantive rules pursuant to Title 5,
chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.